Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
ARTICLE 135
FOREIGN NONPROFIT CORPORATIONS -
AUTHORITY TO CONDUCT ACTIVITIES

Editor's note:

This article was added in 1997 and was subsequently repealed and reenacted in 2003, effective July 1, 2004, resulting in the addition, relocation, and elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this article prior to 2004, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.

Cross references:

For definitions applicable to this article, see §§ 7-90-102 and 7-121-401.

Section

7-135-101. Authority to conduct activities required.

Part 8 of article 90 of this title, providing for the transaction of business or the conduct of activities by foreign entities, applies to foreign nonprofit corporations.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article R&RE, p. 2350, § 332, effective July 1, 2004.